Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Poultry

257.320.
Definitions for KRS 257.330 to 257.350.

The term “baby chicks” or “baby poults” as used in KRS

257.330

to

257.350

means any domestic fowl under the age of six (6) weeks. The term “person” includes also firms and corporations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 103, § 6.

257.330.
Permit required for auction or community sale of baby chicks or poults — Application — Fee — Inspection — Destruction of diseased chicks or poults.

Before any baby chicks or baby poults are offered for sale at any auction or auctions, sale barn, or community sale, except public sales conducted by farmers selling baby chicks or baby poults reared on their own premises, a permit shall be secured from the Division of Animal Health of the Department of Agriculture, or the state veterinarian.

Any person who desires to offer baby chicks or baby poults for sale at any auction or auctions, sale barn, or community sale, shall apply to the division or the state veterinarian for a permit to hold the sale. A form shall be prescribed and furnished by the division. This application shall be submitted at least three (3) days before the sale to allow time for inspection of the chicks or poults offered, by a representative of the division or the state veterinarian before any chicks or poults are sold. This application shall be signed by the person who proposes to conduct the sale, together with the person who owns the property in or on which the sale is to be conducted, if the person who proposes to conduct the sale does not own the property. The application shall designate the date of the proposed sale, the number and breed of the chicks or poults to be offered for sale, and the person or firm by whom they were produced, and shall be accompanied by a fee in the sum of one dollar ($1) per hundred (100) chicks or poults to be offered for sale. The division or the state veterinarian shall be authorized in their discretion to grant or to deny the permit requested in the application, and if deemed necessary or advisable to require the applicant to submit a certificate in a form as the division or the state veterinarian may prescribe, certifying that the baby chicks or baby poults which may be offered for sale are in healthy condition.

On inspection by the representative of the division or state veterinarian, if the chicks or poults offered for sale are found to be diseased, the representative may confiscate all chicks or poults found to be diseased and may destroy the chicks and poults.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 103, §§ 1, 2, 5; 2002, ch. 49, § 7, effective July 15, 2002.

257.340.
Labeling of containers for chicks or poults.

Before any such chicks or poults are offered for sale, or sold, each box, crate, coop or other container shall be plainly labeled with an appropriate statement giving the kind and number of chicks or poults in each container, the date on which such chicks or poults were hatched, and by whom hatched, and any other representations at or prior to the time of sale relative to the purity of the breed, the freedom of such chicks or poults from disease, such as chick bronchitis, and official certification that tests have been made on the parent stock for pullorum disease and that such flock is United States pullorum-tested, United States pullorum-controlled, United States pullorum-passed or United States pullorum-clean. The container should also specify whether it contains males, females or unsexed chicks or poults.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 103, § 3.

257.350.
Reports of sales — Liability of seller on guarantees.

Within three (3) days after the sale, the person who conducted the sale shall submit a statement to the Division of Animal Health of the Department of Agriculture or the state veterinarian, giving a complete list of the number and kind of baby chicks or poults sold, name and address of each purchaser, together with a copy of representation and guarantee made in relation to the sale, if any were made by the person who conducted the sale, and the person conducting the sale shall be held to have had full knowledge of the representations and guarantees made at the time of the sale and shall be as fully responsible and liable for any representation and guarantee as is the person who set forth the representation and guarantee on the containers as provided in KRS

257.340

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 103, § 4; 2002, ch. 49, § 8, effective July 15, 2002.

257.360.
Revolving fund for Department of Agriculture.

All money collected under the provisions of KRS

257.330

to

257.350

shall be paid to the State Treasurer and by him placed in a revolving fund to be used by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of KRS

257.330

to

257.350

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 103, § 9.

257.370.
Pullorum disease — State and federal cooperation in regulations to control.

In order to promote the poultry industry of this state, the Division of Animal Health of the Department of Agriculture is hereby authorized to cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in the promulgation and enforcement of regulations for the control and eradication of pullorum disease.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 1; 2002, ch. 49, § 9, effective July 15, 2002.

257.380.
Regulations by Division of Animal Health to enforce KRS 257.370 to 257.460.

The Division of Animal Health is hereby authorized to promulgate administrative regulations as may be necessary, after public hearing following due public notice, to carry out the provisions of KRS

257.370

to

257.460

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 2; 2002, ch. 49, § 10, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, adoption date and effective date, KRS

13A.330

.

257.390.
Importation of poultry over five months of age.

Chickens, turkeys, or other poultry over five (5) months of age intended for breeding purposes shall not be imported into the state unless they have passed a negative agglutination test for pullorum disease under the supervision of a Division of Animal Health authority of the Office of State Veterinarian within thirty (30) days preceding date of importation, or have originated from flocks authoritatively participating in a pullorum control and eradication phase of the National Poultry Improvement Plan or other USDA-administered plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 3; 2002, ch. 49, § 11, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 115, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.

257.400.
Newly hatched poultry and hatching eggs must originate from approved flocks.

Hatching eggs and all poultry under five (5) months of age including baby chicks, started chicks, turkey poults, and other newly hatched domestic poultry except those intended for immediate slaughter which may be imported into the state under permit issued by the Division of Animal Health of the Office of State Veterinarian, and sold or offered for sale in this state, shall have originated from flocks that meet the pullorum requirements of the National Poultry Improvement Plan or other USDA-administered plan, and the regulations promulgated by authority of KRS

257.370

to

257.460

for the control and eradication of pullorum disease. Nothing in KRS

257.370

to

257.460

, however, shall require any hatchery, dealer, or flock owner to participate in the National Poultry Improvement Plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 4; 2002, ch. 49, § 12, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 115, § 3, effective June 20, 2005.

257.410.
Importation of newly hatched poultry and hatching eggs — Labels.

Hatching eggs and all poultry under five (5) months of age, including baby chicks, started chicks, turkey poults, other newly hatched domestic poultry, except those intended for immediate slaughter, that are imported into this state shall have originated in flocks that meet the pullorum requirements of the National Poultry Improvement Plan, or other USDA-administered plan, and the administrative regulations promulgated by authority of KRS

257.370

to

257.460

. Every container of poultry under five (5) months of age, including baby chicks, started chicks, turkey poults, and any other newly hatched domestic poultry, except those intended for immediate slaughter, and hatching eggs imported into this state shall bear an official label or certificate showing the name and address of the importer, the authority under which the testing for pullorum disease was done, and the pullorum control and eradication class of the product, the use of the certificate or label to be approved by the official state agency or the Division of Animal Health official of the state of origin.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 5; 2002, ch. 49, § 13, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 115, § 4, effective June 20, 2005.

257.420.
Permits for hatcheries and dealers in chicks or eggs.

No person, firm, or corporation shall operate a public hatchery, and no person, dealer, jobber, peddler, or huckster in baby chicks, started chicks, turkey poults, other newly hatched domestic poultry, and hatching eggs shall operate as a public hatchery within this state without obtaining an annual permit from the Division of Animal Health to so operate, and paying a permit fee of ten dollars ($10) per annum. This is not intended to require a permit of hatcheries, chick dealers, chick salesmen, or corporations selling less than one thousand (1,000) chicks per year, or egg dealers selling less than thirty-five hundred (3,500) eggs per year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 6; 2002, ch. 49, § 14, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Construction and effect of restrictive covenant in deed or conveyance specifically prohibiting or limiting the keeping of animals, such as livestock, fowl, etc., on the premises. 89 A.L.R.2d 990.

Keeping poultry as nuisance. 2 A.L.R.3d 965.

257.430.
Permit year.

The permit year shall extend from July 1 of each year to June 30 of the following year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 10.

257.440.
Refusal, suspension, or revocation of permit — Appeal.

Any permit may be suspended or canceled by the Division of Animal Health, after opportunity for a hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, for any violation of KRS

257.370

to

257.460

or the regulations promulgated under KRS

257.370

to

257.460

. Any person who is refused a permit or whose permit is revoked after a hearing may appeal the final order to the Circuit Court of Franklin County in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 8; 1996, ch. 318, § 182, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 49, § 15, effective July 15, 2002.

257.450.
Quarantine of illegally produced or imported eggs or poultry — Destruction.

All poultry of whatever age or species and all hatching eggs that are sold or offered for sale within this state or enter into this state not in compliance with the provisions of KRS

257.370

to

257.460

shall be quarantined by the Division of Animal Health. Where possible, the division shall make the tests necessary to determine whether or not pullorum disease is present in any of the quarantined poultry. With respect to all other poultry where tests are not possible, and to hatching eggs, sufficient proof must be presented that they have originated from approved flocks. The poultry or flocks found to be infected with pullorum disease, and the poultry and hatching eggs lacking the required proof of origin from approved flocks, shall be destroyed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 9; 1950, ch. 10, § 1; 2002, ch. 49, § 16, effective July 15, 2002.

257.460.
Revolving fund for enforcement.

All money collected under the provisions of KRS

257.370

to

257.450

shall be paid to the State Treasurer and by him placed in a revolving fund to be used by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of KRS

257.370

to

257.450

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 165, § 11.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Revolving, trust and agency funds, KRS

45.253

.

257.470.
Access for enforcement.

For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of KRS

257.330

to

257.440

, the inspectors of the Division of Animal Health shall have free access to any premises or vehicles for the purpose of inspection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 10, § 2; 2002, ch. 49, § 17, effective July 15, 2002.